src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NOUN_51sepiväpeippi

+Pl+Abe:ittä{hyph?}peipeittä  NOUN_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;

+Pl+Abl:iltä{hyph?}peipeiltä  NOUN_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ade:illä{hyph?}peipeillä  NOUN_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;

+Pl+All:ille{hyph?}peipeille  NOUN_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ela:istä{hyph?}peipeistä  NOUN_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ess:inä{hyph?}peippeinä  NOUN_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;

+Pl+Gen:ien{hyph?}peippien  NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ine:issä{hyph?}peipeissä  NOUN_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;

+Pl+Nom:ät{hyph?}peipit  NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Par:iä{hyph?}peippejä  NOUN_BACK_POSS_OPT  ;

+Pl+Tra:iksi{hyph?}peipeikse  NOUN_BACK_POSS  ;

+Pl+Tra:iksi{hyph?}peipeiksi  NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Abe:ättä{hyph?}peipittä  NOUN_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;

+Sg+Abl:ältä{hyph?}peipiltä  NOUN_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ade:ällä{hyph?}peipillä  NOUN_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;

+Sg+All:älle{hyph?}peipille  NOUN_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ela:ästä{hyph?}peipistä  NOUN_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ess:änä{hyph?}peippinä  NOUN_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;

+Sg+Gen:än{hyph?}peipin  NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ine:ässä{hyph?}peipissä  NOUN_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;

+Sg+Nom:ä{hyph?}peippi  NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Nom:ä{hyph?}peippi  NOUN_BACK_POSS_OPT  ;

+Sg+Par:ää{hyph?}peippiä  NOUN_BACK_POSS_OPT  ;

+Sg+Tra:äksi{hyph?}peipikse  NOUN_BACK_POSS  ;

+Sg+Tra:äksi{hyph?}peipiksi  NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;


LEXICON NOUN_51suorakulma

+Pl+Abe:itta{hyph?}kulmitta  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Pl+Abl:ilta{hyph?}kulmilta  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ade:illa{hyph?}kulmilla  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Pl+All:ille{hyph?}kulmille  NOUN_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ela:ista{hyph?}kulmista  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ess:ina{hyph?}kulmina  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Pl+Gen:ien{hyph?}kulmien  NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ill:iin{hyph?}kulmiin  NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ine:issa{hyph?}kulmissa  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Pl+Nom:at{hyph?}kulmat  NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Par:ia{hyph?}kulmia  NOUN_BACK_POSS_OPT  ;

+Pl+Tra:iksi{hyph?}kulmikse  NOUN_BACK_POSS  ;

+Pl+Tra:iksi{hyph?}kulmiksi  NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Abe:atta{hyph?}kulmatta  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Sg+Abl:alta{hyph?}kulmalta  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ade:alla{hyph?}kulmalla  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Sg+All:alle{hyph?}kulmalle  NOUN_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ela:asta{hyph?}kulmasta  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ess:ana{hyph?}kulmana  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Sg+Gen:an{hyph?}kulman  NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ill:aan{hyph?}kulmaan  NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ine:assa{hyph?}kulmassa  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Sg+Nom:a{hyph?}kulma  NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Nom:a{hyph?}kulma  NOUN_BACK_POSS_OPT  ;

+Sg+Par:aa{hyph?}kulmaa  NOUN_BACK_POSS_OPT  ;

+Sg+Tra:aksi{hyph?}kulmakse  NOUN_BACK_POSS  ;

+Sg+Tra:aksi{hyph?}kulmaksi  NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;


LEXICON NOUN_51suoraommel

+Pl+Abe:itta{hyph?}ompelitta  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Pl+Abl:ilta{hyph?}ompelilta  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ade:illa{hyph?}ompelilla  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Pl+All:ille{hyph?}ompelille  NOUN_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ela:ista{hyph?}ompelista  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ess:ina{hyph?}ompelina  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Pl+Gen:ien{hyph?}ommelten  NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ine:issa{hyph?}ompelissa  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Pl+Nom:at{hyph?}ompelet  NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Par:ia{hyph?}ompelia  NOUN_BACK_POSS_OPT  ;

+Pl+Tra:iksi{hyph?}ompelikse  NOUN_BACK_POSS  ;

+Pl+Tra:iksi{hyph?}ompeliksi  NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Abe:atta{hyph?}ompeletta  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Sg+Abl:alta{hyph?}ompelelta  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ade:alla{hyph?}ompelella  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Sg+All:alle{hyph?}ompelelle  NOUN_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ela:asta{hyph?}ompelesta  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ess:ana{hyph?}ompelena  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Sg+Gen:an{hyph?}ompelen  NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ine:assa{hyph?}ompelessa  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Sg+Nom:a{hyph?}ommel  NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Nom:a{hyph?}ommel  NOUN_BACK_POSS_OPT  ;

+Sg+Nom:a{hyph?}ommel  NOUN_BACK_POSS_OPT  ;

+Sg+Par:aa{hyph?}ommelta  NOUN_BACK_POSS_OPT  ;

+Sg+Tra:aksi{hyph?}ompelekse  NOUN_BACK_POSS  ;

+Sg+Tra:aksi{hyph?}ompeleksi  NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;


LEXICON NOUN_51syvämeri

+Pl+Abe:ittä{hyph?}merittä  NOUN_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;

+Pl+Abl:iltä{hyph?}meriltä  NOUN_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ade:illä{hyph?}merillä  NOUN_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;

+Pl+All:ille{hyph?}merille  NOUN_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ela:istä{hyph?}meristä  NOUN_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ess:inä{hyph?}merinä  NOUN_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;

+Pl+Gen:ien{hyph?}merien  NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Gen:ien{hyph?}merten  NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ill:iin{hyph?}meriin  NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ine:issä{hyph?}merissä  NOUN_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;

+Pl+Nom:ät{hyph?}meret  NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Par:iä{hyph?}meriä  NOUN_BACK_POSS_OPT  ;

+Pl+Tra:iksi{hyph?}merikse  NOUN_BACK_POSS  ;

+Pl+Tra:iksi{hyph?}meriksi  NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Abe:ättä{hyph?}merettä  NOUN_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;

+Sg+Abl:ältä{hyph?}mereltä  NOUN_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ade:ällä{hyph?}merellä  NOUN_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;

+Sg+All:älle{hyph?}merelle  NOUN_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ela:ästä{hyph?}merestä  NOUN_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ess:änä{hyph?}merenä  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Sg+Gen:än{hyph?}meren  NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ill:ään{hyph?}mereen  NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ine:ässä{hyph?}meressä  NOUN_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;

+Sg+Nom:ä{hyph?}meri  NOUN_BACK_POSS_OPT  ;

+Sg+Par:ää{hyph?}merta  NOUN_BACK_POSS_OPT  ;

+Sg+Tra:äksi{hyph?}merekse  NOUN_BACK_POSS  ;

+Sg+Tra:äksi{hyph?}mereksi  NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;


LEXICON NOUN_51särkynytsydän

+Pl+Abe:eittä{hyph?}sydämittä  NOUN_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;

+Pl+Abl:eiltä{hyph?}sydämiltä  NOUN_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ade:eillä{hyph?}sydämille  NOUN_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;

+Pl+All:eille{hyph?}sydämillä  NOUN_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ela:eistä{hyph?}sydämistä  NOUN_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ess:einä{hyph?}sydäminä  NOUN_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;

+Pl+Gen:eiden{hyph?}sydämien  NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Gen:eiden{hyph?}sydänten  NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ine:eissä{hyph?}sydämissä  NOUN_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;

+Pl+Nom:eet{hyph?}sydämet  NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Par:eitä{hyph?}sydämiä  NOUN_BACK_POSS_OPT  ;

+Pl+Tra:eiksi{hyph?}sydämikse  NOUN_BACK_POSS  ;

+Pl+Tra:eiksi{hyph?}sydämiksi  NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Abe:eettä{hyph?}sydämettä  NOUN_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;

+Sg+Abl:eeltä{hyph?}sydämeltä  NOUN_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ade:eellä{hyph?}sydämellä  NOUN_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;

+Sg+All:eelle{hyph?}sydämelle  NOUN_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ela:eestä{hyph?}sydämestä  NOUN_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ess:eenä{hyph?}sydämenä  NOUN_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;

+Sg+Gen:een{hyph?}sydämen  NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ine:eessä{hyph?}sydämessä  NOUN_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;

+Sg+Nom:yt{hyph?}sydän  NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Nom:yt{hyph?}sydän  NOUN_BACK_POSS_OPT  ;

+Sg+Nom:yt{hyph?}sydän  NOUN_BACK_POSS_OPT  ;

+Sg+Par:yttä{hyph?}sydäntä  NOUN_BACK_POSS_OPT  ;

+Sg+Tra:eeksi{hyph?}sydämekse  NOUN_BACK_POSS  ;

+Sg+Tra:eeksi{hyph?}sydämeksi  NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
