src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NOUN_Cmp
särkynytsydän+N:särkyn  NOUN_51särkynytsydän  ;
sepiväpeippi+N:sepiv  NOUN_51sepiväpeippi  ;
suorakulma+N:suor  NOUN_51suorakulma  ;
suoraommel+N:suor  NOUN_51suoraommel  ;
syvämeri+N:syv  NOUN_51syvämeri  ;
